Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 152.01, subdivision 15a, is amended to read: Subd. 15a. Sell. "Sell" means: (1) to sell, give away, barter, deliver, exchange, distribute or dispose of to another, or to manufacture; or deleted text begin (2) to offer or agree to perform an act listed in clause (1); or deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end to possess with intent to perform an act listed in clause (1). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end